Massachusetts, session 194th, S928.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fourth paragraph the following:
For purposes of this paragraph, a public higher education institution shall mean a school
in the University of Massachusetts segment or in the state university segment of the system of
public institutions of higher education established in section 5 of chapter 15A. When deciding
whether to grant admission to an applicant, a public higher education institution shall not
consider the applicant’s familial relationship to a graduate of the institution. A public higher
education institution shall not include in the documents that it uses to consider an applicant for
admission information that discloses the name of any college or university that any relative of
the applicant attended.
of 2

SECTION 2. Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 30A the following:
Section 30B. When deciding whether to grant admission to an applicant, a degree-
granting institution of higher education located in the commonwealth authorized to grant degrees
by the board of higher education shall not consider the applicant’s familial relationship to a
graduate of the institution. Such institution shall not include in the documents that it uses to
consider an applicant for admission information that discloses the name of any college or
university that any relative of the applicant attended.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect for admission decisions that lead to an
applicant’s initial enrollment in a public higher education institution in the 2026-2027 school
year.
of 2